Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 3.1 Dog Racing in Burrillville, Lincoln, and West Greenwich

41-3.1-1.
Operation of dog racing facilities.

Any person desiring to operate a facility for the exhibition of the sport called dog racing in the towns of Burrillville, Lincoln, and West Greenwich, may do so upon the compliance with the terms and provisions of this chapter and pursuant to the provisions of chapter 9 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 2.

41-3.1-2.
“Sports facilities” defined.

The words “sports facilities” as used in this chapter, means a building or enclosure in which dog racing is conducted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1.

41-3.1-3.
Regulation of operations.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing is hereby authorized to license dog racing in the towns of Burrillville, Lincoln, and West Greenwich. The operation of a dog track shall be under the division’s supervision. The division is hereby authorized to issue rules and regulations for the supervision of the operations, and the regulations are to be issued prior to commencement of licensing hearings.

Any license granted under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the rules and regulations promulgated by the division and shall be subject to suspension or revocation for any cause that the division shall deem sufficient after giving the licensee a reasonable opportunity for a hearing at which he or she shall have the right to be represented by counsel. If any license is suspended or revoked, the division shall state the reasons for the suspension or revocation and cause an entry of the reasons to be made on the record books of the division.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing in the department of business regulation shall be prohibited from licensing dog racing and/or the operation of a dog track upon which dog racing occurs in the town of Lincoln. Any license having been issued and in effect as of the effective date of this section shall be null and void and any licensee shall be prohibited from operating thereunder; provided, however, that the following entities shall be deemed pari-mutuel licensees as defined in §

42-61.2-1

et seq. and licensees as defined in §

41-11-1

et seq.: (1) Any entity having been issued a license to operate a dog track prior to December 31, 2008; and (2) Any entity having been issued a license to operate a dog track prior to December 31, 2008, that after that date is reorganized under a confirmed plan of reorganization pursuant to chapter 11 of title 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. §§ 101 — 1532); and provided, further, that in the case of a reorganized licensee under clause (2), its application for a facility permit license is approved and issued by the department of business regulation in the event of a proposed change in control of the entity. Nothing herein shall limit the ability of the department of business regulation, in connection with a proposed change in control, to investigate and subject to the regulatory due diligence process, any holder of an ownership interest regardless of percentage of ownership held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 3.

41-3.1-4.
Powers and duties of gaming and athletics licensing division.

In addition to the other powers conferred upon the division, the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall carry out the provisions of this chapter, and to that end, the division may:

Personally, or by agent, supervise and check the making of pari-mutuel pools and wagers and the distribution therefrom;

Fix and set the dates within which any dog track may be operated; provided, however, there shall be at least one hundred twenty-five (125) days annually of the operation; and

Require any applicant for a permit to operate a dog track to file an application under oath setting forth:

The full name of the person, firm, corporation, or association, and if a corporation, the name of the state under which it is incorporated, as well as the names of the officers and directors of the corporation, and their places of residence, or if an association, the name and residence of the members of the association;

The exact location where it is desired to operate a dog track;

Whether or not the dog track is owned or leased, and if leased, the name, residence, and address of the owners or lessees, or if the owner or lessee be a corporation, the name and address of the officers and directors thereof;

A statement of the assets and liabilities of the person, firm, corporation, or association making application for the permit; and

Other information as the division may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 3.

41-3.1-5.
Wages and pari-mutuel pools permitted within enclosure of dog track.

The pari-mutuel system, so called, or other form of betting system authorized by this chapter, shall not be used or permitted at any location other than the race track at which the dog racing event is licensed to be conducted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1.

41-3.1-5.1.
Sale or purchase of twin-double tickets.

The sale or purchase of twin-double tickets or attempting to aid or abet in the sale or purchase of twin-double tickets through solicitation of patrons attending, other than through pari-mutuel machines, is prohibited. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be denied admission to all dog tracks in the state and may be prosecuted. Persons convicted of violating the provisions of this chapter shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for up to one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 294, § 1.

41-3.1-6.
Tax on betting and licensee’s commission.

The commission of a licensee on pari-mutuel pools and wagers shall be eighteen percent (18%) of the amount contributed thereto.

After deducting the commission and the “breaks,” hereafter defined, a pari-mutuel pool shall be redistributed to the contributors. The licensee conducting these events pursuant to this chapter shall pay a tax to the state of five and one-half percent (5.5%) of the amounts contributed to the pari-mutuel pool. The licensee shall pay a tax of one-half of one percent (.5%) of the pool to each city or town in which any portion of the racing facility, including parking areas, storage areas, buildings, and entrances or exits to or from property being used in conjunction with the operation of dog racing, is located.

Redistribution of funds otherwise distributable to the contributors to the pari-mutuel pools shall be a sum equal to the next lowest multiple of ten (10).

No distribution of a pari-mutuel pool shall be made of the odd cents of any sum otherwise distributable, which odd cents shall be known as the “breaks.”

The “breaks” shall be known as the difference between the amount contributed to a pari-mutuel pool and the total of the commission of the licensee and the sums actually redistributed to the contributors.

No person or corporation shall directly or indirectly purchase pari-mutuel tickets or participate in the purchase of any part of a pari-mutuel pool for another for hire or for any gratuity, and no person shall purchase any part of a pari-mutuel pool, through another, wherein he or she gives or pays directly or indirectly the other person anything of value, and any person violating this section shall be fined the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1.

41-3.1-7.
Distribution of funds.

All money mentioned in this chapter derived from taxes on wagers and pari-mutuel pools shall be disbursed by the state treasurer pursuant to chapter 4 of this title. Except as is inconsistent therewith, the provisions of chapters 3 and 4 of this title shall apply to the sport of dog racing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1.

41-3.1-8.
Tax on breaks — Distribution.

A tax is hereby levied upon every pari-mutuel pool conducted at the dog track, equal to fifty percent (50%) of the “breaks” as defined in §

41-3.1-6(d)

.

It shall be the duty of every dog track licensee to pay unto the state treasurer the tax hereby levied and the licensee shall be liable therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1.

41-3.1-9.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 341, § 1.

41-3.1-10.
Chemical test.

There shall be administered to one randomly selected finisher, of every dog race, the appropriate chemical test authorized by the division of gaming and athletics licensing. The department of business regulation is authorized to establish by rule and regulation procedures required for the chemical testing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 124; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 424, § 1.

41-3.1-11.
Applications — Disclosure requirements.

Upon filing of an application(s) to the department of business regulation or the division of lotteries with respect to a parimutuel or video lottery license, the department of business regulation and/or the division of lotteries, as the case may be, shall, upon a proper request made pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38, entitled “access to public records,” disclose the name, business address, and contact person of the person or entity filing such an application in accordance with chapter 2 of title 38. Any and all other personal or financial information contained in the application(s) is expressly exempted from provisions of chapter 2 of title 38 and is hereby deemed not to be a public record as defined therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 302, § 1.